Utah, session 2026, HB574.
Section 1. Section 41-6a-1803 is amended to read:41-6a-1803. Driver and passengers -- Seat belt or child restraint device required.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(c), the operator of a motor vehicle operated on a highway shall:(i)wear a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt;(ii)provide for the protection of each person younger than eight years old by using a child restraint device to restrain each person in the manner prescribed by the manufacturer of the device; and(iii)provide for the protection of each person that is at least eight years old and no less than 16 years old by securing, or causing to be secured, a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt on each person.(b)Notwithstanding the requirement under Subsection (1)(a)(ii), a child under eight years old who is 57 inches tall or taller:(i)is exempt from the requirement in Subsection (1)(a)(ii) to be in a child restraint device; and(ii)shall use a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt as required in Subsection (1)(a)(iii).(c)An adult passenger who is utilizing transportation network services described in Section 13-51-102 or a taxicab described in Section 53-3-102 shall:(i)provide for the protection of each person younger than eight years old who is under the adult's supervision by using a child restraint device to restrain the person in the manner prescribed by the manufacturer of the device; and(ii)provide for the protection of each person who is under the adult's supervision and is at least eight years old and no less than 16 years old by securing, or causing to be secured, a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt on the person.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the operator of a motor vehicle operated on a highway shall:(i)wear a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt; and(ii)provide for the protection of each individual younger than 16 years old by complying with the child restraint and safety belt requirements described in Section 41-6a-1807.(b)A passenger that is 18 years old or older who is a passenger and using a transportation network service as described in Section 13-51-102 or a taxicab described in Section 53-3-102 shall:(i)provide for the protection of each individual who is under the adult's supervision and is younger than eight years old by using a child restraint device as described in Section 41-6a-1807 to restrain the individual in the manner prescribed by the manufacturer of the device; and(ii)provide for the protection of each individual who is under the adult's supervision and is eight years old or older and younger than 16 years old by securing, or causing to be secured, a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt on the individual.(2)A person An individual 16 years old or older who is a passenger in a motor vehicle operated on a highway shall wear a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt.(3)If more than one person is individual is in violation of Subsection (1) by not using a child restraint device or wearing a safety belt in violation of Subsection (1), it is considered only one offense, and the driver may receive only one citation for that offense.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 41-6a-1805 is amended to read:41-6a-1805. Penalty for violation.(1)(a)A person who violates Section 41-6a-1803 or Section 41-6a-1807 is guilty of an infraction and shall be fined a maximum of $45.(b)Until July 1, 2018, a peace officer may not issue a citation to an individual for a violation of Section 41-6a-1803 if the person has not previously been warned for a violation of Section 41-6a-1803 but shall issue the individual a warning informing the individual that operating or being a passenger in a vehicle without wearing a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt is prohibited.(c)The court shall waive all of the fine for a first violation of Subsection 41-6a-1803(1)(a)(ii) if the person submits proof of acquisition, rental, or purchase of a child restraint device.(2)Points for a motor vehicle reportable violation, as defined under Section 53-3-102, may not be assessed against a person for a violation of Section 41-6a-1803 or Section 41-6a-1807.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 41-6a-1807 is enacted to read:41-6a-1807. Child restraint device requirements.(1)An operator shall restrain a child who is younger than two years old in a rear-facing child restraint system that complies with all applicable federal rules until the child reaches the weight or height limit of the child restraint system set by the manufacturer.(2)An operator shall restrain a child in a forward-facing child restraint system with an internal harness until the child reaches the weight or height limit set by the manufacturer of the child restraint system if:(a)the child is two years old or older; or(b)the child has reached the rear-facing weight or height limit as described by the manufacturer of the child restraint system.(3)An operator shall restrain a child in a belt-positioning child booster seat, secured with a vehicle's lap-shoulder safety belt, in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions if:(a)the child is four years old or older; or(b)the child has reached the forward-facing weight and height limits as described by the manufacturer of the child restraint system.(4)An operator shall restrain a child with the motor vehicle's adult safety belt adjusted and fastened around the child's body to fit correctly if:(a)the child is nine years old or older; or(b)the child has reached the weight or height limit described by the manufacturer of a child restraint system or belt-positioning child booster seat.(5)For purposes of Subsection (4), the adult safety belt fits correctly if:(a)the child sits all the way back against the vehicle seat;(b)the child's knees bend over the edge of the vehicle seat;(c)the safety belt fits snugly across the child's thighs and lower hips, and not the child's abdomen; and(d)the shoulder strap snugly crosses the center of the child's chest and not the child's neck.(6)An operator shall transport a child who is younger than 13 years old in the rear seat of a motor vehicle, when available, in a properly used child restraint system, belt-positioning child booster seat, or adult safety belt that is in accordance with all applicable federal rules.(7)A child who because of age, height, or weight can be placed in more than one safety category as described in this section shall be placed in the more protective category.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.